Utah statutes.
58-56-8.   Compliance with codes -- Responsibility for inspections -- Appeals.

(1)  The responsibility for inspection of construction projects and enforcement of compliance with provisions of the codes shall be with the compliance agency having jurisdiction over the project and the applicable codes.

(2)  A finding by a compliance agency that a licensed contractor, electrician, or plumber has materially violated the provisions of a code in a manner to jeopardize the public health, safety, and welfare and failed to comply with corrective orders of the compliance agency shall be furnished in writing to the division by the compliance agency.  It is the responsibility of the compliance agency to conduct a primary investigation to determine that, in fact, there has been a material violation of the provisions of the code jeopardizing the public interest and provide the report of investigation to the division.

(3)  Each compliance agency shall establish a method of appeal by which a person disputing the application and interpretation of a code may appeal and receive a timely review of the disputed issues in accordance with the codes adopted or approved under Section 58-56-4.  If a compliance agency refuses to establish a method of appeal, the commission shall act as the appeals board and conduct a hearing within 45 days.  The findings of the commission shall be binding.  An appeals board established under this section shall have no authority to interpret the administrative provisions of the codes nor shall the appeals board be empowered to waive requirements of the codes.

